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DTC C0278 / 11,C0279 / 12 ABSSolenoidRelayCircuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This relay supplies power to each ABS solenoid. After the ignition switch is turned ON, if the initial check is
OK, the relay goes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C0278 / 11

Conditions 1.and2.continue for0.2sec.ormore:
1.ECUterminal IG 1 voltage is9.5V to 17.0Vand the

solenoid relay is ON, however, the contact point of the
solenoid relay isOFF.

2.Withsolenoid relayON,ECUterminal IG 1 voltagebe-
comes9.5Vor lessand thecontactpointof thesole-
noid relay does not become ON.

SABSsolenoid relay
SABSsolenoid relaycircuit

C0279 / 12

ImmediatelyafterECUterminal IG 1 becomesON,and
solenoid relay is OFF, however, when the condition that
the solenoid relay due to the contact point is ON continues
for 0.2 sec. or more.
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WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Start the inspection fromstep 1 incaseofusing thehand −held testerandstart fromstep2 incaseofnot
using thehand −held tester.

1 CheckABSsolenoidrelayoperation.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theACTIVETESTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check theoperationsoundof theABSsolenoid relaywhenoperating itwith thehand −held tester.
OK:

The operation sound of the ABS solenoid relay should be heard.

OK Go to step 6.

NG

2Checkvoltagebetweenterminals 1 and2ofengineroomJ/B(forABSsolenoid
relay).

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS solenoid relay from engine room J/B.
CHECK:
Measure thevoltagebetween terminals 1 and2ofengine room
J/B(forABSsolenoid relay).
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and repair harness or connector.

OK
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3 Check ABS solenoid relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove ABS solenoid relay from engine room J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid relay.
OK:

Terminals 4 and 6
Continuity

(Referencevalue80 �)

Terminals 2 and 3 Continuity

Terminals 1 and3 Open

CHECK:
(a) Apply battery voltage between terminals 4 and 6.
(b) Check continuity between each terminal of ABS solenoid

relay.
OK:

Terminals 2 and 3 Open

Terminals 1 and3 Continuity

NG Replace ABS solenoid relay.

OK
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4 Check continuity between terminals 3 of ABS solenoid relay and terminal AST of
skid control ECU.

CHECK:
Check continuity between terminal 3 of ABS solenoid relay and
terminal AST of skid control ECU.
OK:

Continuity
HINT:
There is a resistance of 33 ± 3 � between terminals 4 of con-
nector A48 and terminal 1 of connector A49.

NG Repair or replace harness, connector or hy-
draulic brake booster.

OK

5 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between ABS sole-
noid relay and skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

If the same code is still output after the DTC is deleted, check the contact condition of each con-
nection. If the connections are normal, the ECU may be defective.
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6 Check for open circuit in harness and connector between AST of hydraulic brake
booster and AST of skid control ECU (See page IN−38).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace hydraulic brake booster or skid con-
trol ECU.


